src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls-unacc/N-I-miini_gt-norm-unacc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - miini - ok : # -m inanimate noun, berry AEW NA1
     miini+NI+Sg: miini
     miini+NI+Pl: miinistsi
     miini+NI+Non: miini

     miini+NI+Px1Sg+Sg: [ nitsiini, nitsiinimi ]
     miini+NI+Px1Sg+Pl: [ nitsiinistsi, nitsiinimistsi ]
     miini+NI+Px1Sg+Non: [ nitsiini, nitsiinimi ]

     miini+NI+Px1Pl+Sg: [ nitsiininnaani, nitsiiniminnaani ]
     miini+NI+Px1Pl+Pl: [ nitsiininnaanistsi, nitsiiniminnaanistsi ]
     miini+NI+Px1Pl+Non: [ nitsiininnaani, nitsiiniminnaani ]

     miini+NI+Px21Pl+Sg: [ kitsiininnooni, kitsiiniminnooni ]
     miini+NI+Px21Pl+Pl: [ kitsiininnoonistsi, kitsiiniminnoonistsi ]
     miini+NI+Px21Pl+Non: [ kitsiininnooni, kitsiiniminnooni ]

     miini+NI+Px2Sg+Sg: [ kitsiini, kitsiinimi ]
     miini+NI+Px2Sg+Pl: [ kitsiinistsi, kitsiinimistsi ]
     miini+NI+Px2Sg+Non: [ kitsiini, kitsiinimi ]

     miini+NI+Px2Pl+Sg: [ kitsiinoaawayi, kitsiinimoaawayi ]
     miini+NI+Px2Pl+Pl: [ kitsiinoaawaistsi, kitsiinimoaawaistsi ]
     miini+NI+Px2Pl+Non: [ kitsiinoaawai, kitsiinimoaawai ]

     miini+NI+Px3Sg+Sg: [ otsiini, otsiinimi ]
     miini+NI+Px3Sg+Pl: [ otsiinistsi, otsiinimistsi ]
     miini+NI+Px3Sg+Non: [ otsiini, otsiinimi ]

     miini+NI+Px3Pl+Sg: [ otsiinoaawayi, otsiinimoaawayi ]
     miini+NI+Px3Pl+Pl: [ otsiinoaawaistsi, otsiinimoaawaistsi ]
     miini+NI+Px3Pl+Non: [ otsiinoaawai, otsiinimoaawai ]
     
     PS/maohk+miini+NI+Pl: maohksiinistsi
